Utah statutes.
54-4-1.1.   Wholesale electrical cooperative exempt from rate regulation -- Requirements for rate increase.

The commission does not have the authority under the provisions of this title to regulate, fix, or otherwise approve or establish the rates, fares, tolls, or charges of a wholesale electrical cooperative. A wholesale electrical cooperative shall not vary its charges within any type or classification of service to any member or the public, one from the other, or from schedules of rates, fares, tolls, or charges which schedules shall be filed at least annually with the Division of Public Utilities for informational purposes only. The prohibition of this section applies only to the rates, fares, tolls, or charges and does not exempt wholesale electrical cooperatives from other areas of regulation under this title including, but not limited to, regulation having an indirect effect on rates, fares, tolls, or charges but which does not constitute an approval or establishment of them.

A wholesale electrical cooperative must, prior to the implementation of any rate increase after January 1, 1984, hold a public meeting for all its customers and members. Notice must be mailed at least 10 days prior to the meeting. In addition, any schedule of new rates or other change that results in new rates must be approved by the board of directors of the wholesale electrical cooperative.

